Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF456.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 152.137, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Prohibited conduct. (a) No person may knowingly engage in any of the following activities in the presence of a child or vulnerable adult; in the residence of a child or a vulnerable adult; in a building, structure, conveyance, or outdoor location where a child or vulnerable adult might reasonably be expected to be present; in a room offered to the public for overnight accommodation; or in any multiple unit residential building: (1) manufacturing or attempting to manufacture methamphetamine; (2) storing any chemical substance; (3) storing any methamphetamine waste products; or (4) storing any methamphetamine paraphernalia. (b) No person may knowingly cause or permit a child or vulnerable adult to inhale, be exposed to, have contact with, or ingest methamphetamine, a chemical substance, or methamphetamine paraphernalia. new text begin (c) No person may knowingly cause or permit a child or vulnerable adult to inhale, be exposed to, have contact with, or ingest fentanyl. new text end